Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1520
Jurisdiction to hear challenge.

Pursuant to Article III, section 10, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the Legislature is vested with the jurisdiction to hear any challenge to the qualifications of a member of the Legislature and is the judge of the elections, returns, and qualifications of its members.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 27.